Maryland, session 2025, SB0034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0034*

SENATE BILL 34
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, overhead transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) aviation safety as determined by the Maryland Aviation
Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line based on the best available scientific
information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or
municipal corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual
and long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and

SENATE BILL 34 3
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified
in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article.
(f) For the construction of an overhead transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
and
(ii) for construction related to a new overhead transmission line, the
alternative routes that the applicant considered, including:
1. the estimated capital and operating costs of each
alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative route was rejected;
AND
2. THE IMPACT OF THE PROPOSED OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE ON PROPERTIES THAT ARE IN THE ALTERNATIVE ROUTE AND
SUBJECT TO AN EXISTING CONSERVATION EASEMENT;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the overhead transmission
line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the overhead transmission line; [and]
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the overhead transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist; AND
(4) REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO:

SENATE BILL 34
(I) MINIMIZE THE IMPACT ON PROPERTIES THAT ARE IN THE
PROPOSED OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE ROUTE AND SUBJECT TO AN EXISTING
CONSERVATION EASEMENT; OR
(II) CHANGE THE PROPOSED OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE
ROUTE TO MINIMIZE THE IMPACT ON PROPERTIES THAT ARE IN THE PROPOSED
ROUTE AND SUBJECT TO AN EXISTING CONSERVATION EASEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.